Utah statutes.
53A-6-104.1.   Reinstatement of a license.
(1)  An educator who previously held a license and whose license has expired
may have the license reinstated by:
(a)  filing an application with the board on the form prescribed by the board;
(b)  paying the fee required by Section 53A-6-105; and
(c)  submitting to a criminal background check as required by Section
53A-6-401.
(2)  Upon successful completion of the criminal background check and
verification that the applicant's previous license had not been revoked,
suspended, or surrendered, the board shall reinstate the license.
(3)  An educator whose license is reinstated may not be required to obtain
professional development not required of other educators with the same number
of years of experience, except as provided in Subsection (4).
(4)  The principal of the school at which an educator whose license is
reinstated is employed shall provide information and training, based on the
educator's experience and education, that will assist the educator in
performing the educator's assigned position.
(5)  The procedures for reinstating a license as provided in this section do
not apply to an educator's license that expires while the educator is employed
in a position requiring the license.
